Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3836.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2300 of Title 21, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Asset
Forfeiture Due Process and Property Rights Restoration Act".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2301 of Title 21, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in the Asset Forfeiture Due Process and Property
Rights Restoration Act:
1. "Agency" means any state law enforcement agency, district
attorney task force, a county sheriff, or police department;
2. "Criminal forfeiture" means the forfeiture of property
ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction as part of a criminal
sentence after conviction;
Req. No. 14519 Page 2

3. "Property" includes all real and personal property, tangible
or intangible, subject to seizure including, but not limited to,
currency, vehicles, and firearms; and
4. "Seizure" means the act of taking possession of property by
an agency pursuant to lawful authority.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2302 of Title 21, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Property shall only be forfeited in this state upon the
property owner being convicted of a criminal offense and the state
meeting its burden of proof as required in subsection B of this
section. Criminal forfeiture proceedings as provided by law shall
occur only after a criminal conviction.
B. The state shall prove by clear and convincing evidence that
the property is:
1. An instrumentality of the offense; or
2. The proceeds of the offense for which the property owner was
convicted.
C. 1. Any person asserting a legal interest in seized property
may raise an innocent-owner defense. The state shall bear the
burden to prove by clear and convincing evidence that the person
making the innocent-owner defense is not an innocent owner.


Req. No. 14519 Page 3

D. All proceeds from criminal forfeiture shall be deposited
into the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury and shall not
accrue to any fund of any agency involved in the seizure.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2303 of Title 21, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. If no criminal charges are filed within sixty (60) days of
the seizure of any property by an agency, the property shall be
returned to the owner within fifteen (15) days.
B. If criminal charges are filed but result in dismissal,
acquittal, or deferred prosecution, the property shall be returned
within fifteen (15) days of the dismissal, acquittal, or deferred
prosecution.
C. The seizure of property retained after fifteen (15) days in
violation of subsections A or B of this section shall create a
rebuttable presumption in any subsequent litigation that the seizure
was unlawful.
D. Property retained after fifteen (15) days in violation of
subsections A or B of this section shall not be transferred to any
federal agency for forfeiture or disposal.
E. Any agency that fails to comply with subsections A or B of
this section shall be subject to the following:


Req. No. 14519 Page 4

1. A civil penalty of not less than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars
($250.00) per day for each day the property is wrongfully retained
beyond the statutory deadline;
2. The agency shall pay all attorney fees and court costs
incurred by the property owner in securing return of the property;
3. If a court finds the agency acted with intentional,
reckless, or deliberate indifference, the property owner shall be
awarded treble damages based on the fair market value of the
property; and
4. If the intentional misconduct of the agency caused the
failure to comply with subsections A or B of this section, the court
may order mandatory training and the agency shall:
a. conduct a formal internal investigation,
b. report the findings of the investigation to the
Attorney General, and
c. implement corrective or disciplinary actions.
F. Any agency assessed civil penalties pursuant to subsection E
of this section shall appear on the public dashboard of the Internet
website of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for
three (3) years accompanied by the penalty amounts assessed and
judicial findings.
G. Nothing in this section shall prevent individuals from
pursuing any other remedies available under state or federal law,

Req. No. 14519 Page 5

incl uding actions pursuant to Section 1983 of Title 42 of the United
States Code.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2304 of Title 21, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Any peace officer, employee, or agent of an agency who
knowingly, willfully, or intentionally retains property beyond the
deadlines provided for in Section 4 of this act, transfers property
to a federal agency to avoid state forfeiture restrictions, or
knowingly files false or misleading seizure or forfeiture reports,
shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a
fine of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than
Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), imprisonment in the county jail
for a term of not more than one (1) year, and mandatory removal of
the person from any position involving seizures, asset handling,
evidence control, or forfeiture authority for not less than five (5)
years.
B. Any peace officer, employee, or agent of an agency convicted
of a second or subsequent offense shall be guilty of a felony
punishable by a fine of not less than Five Thousand Dollars
($5,000.00), imprisonment in the custody of the Department of
Corrections for a term of not more than three (3) years, and
permanent disqualification from employment as a peace officer,

Req. No. 14519 Page 6

empl oyee, or agent of an agency or any other capacity involving
seizure or control of seized property.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2305 of Title 21, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. No agency shall indemnify, reimburse, or use public funds to
pay:
1. Civil penalties assessed under Section 4 of this act;
2. Fines or criminal penalties imposed under Section 5 of this
act;
3. Attorney fees or litigation costs incurred by a peace
officer, employee, or agent of an agency found to have acted
willfully or intentionally; or
4. Any settlement arising from claims in which willful or
intentional misconduct is established.
B. Agencies may provide legal representation to peace officers,
employees, or agents of an agency only for acts not involving
willful or intentional misconduct.
C. Any attempt to indemnify or reimburse in violation of this
section shall be void as a matter of law, constitute a misuse of
public funds, and shall be referred to the State Auditor and
Inspector and Attorney General for further investigation.


Req. No. 14519 Page 7

SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2306 of Title 21, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall
develop and maintain a publicly accessible dashboard on the Internet
website of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services
summarizing all seizures and criminal forfeiture actions statewide.
B. The dashboard shall include the following information:
1. The type and estimated value of property seized;
2. The agency involved;
3. The date and location of seizure;
4. Whether criminal charges were filed;
5. Final disposition of both the criminal case and the seized
property; and
6. Any penalties assessed under this act.
C. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall
redact all personally identifying information of private citizens.
SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2307 of Title 21, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. No agency may transfer seized property to a federal agency
unless:
1. The property value exceeds Fifty Thousand Dollars
($50,000.00); and
Req. No. 14519 Page 8

2. A federal judge certifies that the seizure of property is
directly related to an interstate criminal enterprise.
B. Agencies shall not participate in federal equitable-sharing
programs for purposes of circumventing state forfeiture laws.
SECTION 9. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2308 of Title 21, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Any civil forfeiture case not reduced to final judgment on
or before the effective date of this act shall be dismissed, and
property shall be returned to the owner within fifteen (15) days of
the effective date of this act unless connected to an active
criminal case eligible for criminal forfeiture.
B. Completed forfeitures based on a valid criminal conviction
shall remain enforceable.
SECTION 10. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2309 of Title 21, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Attorney General shall promulgate rules necessary to
implement the Asset Forfeiture Due Process and Property Rights
Restoration Act and establish uniform statewide criminal forfeiture
procedures.
SECTION 11. REPEALER 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1738, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 133, O.S.L. 2023 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 1738), is hereby repealed.
Req. No. 14519 Page 9

SECTION 12. REPEALER 47 O.S. 2021, Section 11-902b, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 13. REPEALER 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1505, as
amended by Section 195, Chapter 282, O.S.L. 2022 (47 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 1505), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 14. REPEALER 63 O.S. 2021, Sections 2-503, 2-
503A, as amended by Section 58, Chapter 171, O.S.L. 2025 and 2-506
(63 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 2-503A), are hereby repealed.
SECTION 15. REPEALER 63 O.S. 2021, Section 4255, as
amended by Section 68, Chapter 171, O.S.L. 2025 (63 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 4255), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 16. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14519 GRS 01/06/26










Req. No. 14519 Page 10